Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.360

Certain findings and information in orders.

(1) Orders issued by the court following a hearing must identify the persons who participated in the hearing and whether each person appeared in person, by telephone, by video, or by other electronic means. If the respondent appeared at the hearing, the order must identify that the respondent has knowledge of the court's order.

(2) Courts shall not accept agreed orders unless there are findings indicating whether the respondent is a credible threat to the physical safety of the protected person or child.

(3) The court shall ensure that in issuing protection orders, including, but not limited to, orders to reissue temporary protection orders and orders to renew protection orders, the court specifies whether the respondent is ordered to surrender, and prohibited from possessing, firearms and dangerous weapons.

(4) If the court issued a temporary protection order that included a temporary order to surrender and prohibit weapons, the temporary order to surrender and prohibit weapons must automatically reissue with the temporary protection order. If the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that irreparable injury to the petitioner will not result through the modification or termination of the order to surrender and prohibit weapons as originally entered, then the court must make specific findings.

(5) If the court has information regarding any of the respondent's known aliases, that information must be included in the protection order.

[ 2021 c 215 s 49.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.